Maryland, session 2025, HB0750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–323.
(f) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Affiliate” means a person:
1. that directly or indirectly owns at least 80% of a business
entity; or
2. at least 80% of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by a
business entity.
(iii) “Business entity” means a person conducting a trade or business
in the State that is subject to the State individual or corporate income tax or insurance
premiums tax.
(iv) “Full–time position” means a position requiring at least 840
hours of an individual’s time during at least 24 weeks in a 6–month period.
– 1 –

Ch. 236 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(v) “New or expanded premises” means commercial or industrial
real property, including a building or part of a building that has not been previously
occupied, where a business entity or its affiliates locate to conduct business.]
[(vi)] (V) 1. “New permanent full–time position” means a
position that is:
A. a full–time position of indefinite duration;
B. located in Washington County;
C. newly created, as a result of the establishment,
RENOVATION, or expansion of a business facility in the county; and
D. filled.
2. “New permanent full–time position” does not include a
position that is:
A. created when an employment function is shifted from an
existing business facility of the business entity or its affiliates located in Washington
County to another business facility of the same entity or its affiliates, if the position does
not represent a net new job in the county;
B. created through a change in ownership of a trade or
business;
C. created through a consolidation, merger, or restructuring
of a business entity or its affiliates, if the position does not represent a net new job in the
county;
D. created when an employment function is contractually
shifted from an existing business entity or its affiliates located in the county to another
business entity or its affiliates, if the position does not represent a net new job in the county;
or
E. filled for a period of less than 12 months.
(VI) “NEW, RENOVATED, OR EXPANDED PREMISES” MEANS
COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING A BUILDING OR PART OF
A BUILDING THAT HAS NOT BEEN PREVIOUSLY OCCUPIED, WHERE A BUSINESS
ENTITY OR ITS AFFILIATES LOCATE TO CONDUCT BUSINESS.
(2) The governing body of Washington County may grant, by law, a
property tax credit against the county property tax imposed on real property owned or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 236
leased by a business entity that meets the requirements specified for the property tax credit
under this subsection.
(3) To qualify for a property tax credit under this subsection, before a
business entity meets the requirements specified for the property tax credit under
paragraph (4) of this subsection, the business entity shall provide written notification to
the governing body of Washington County stating:
(i) that the business entity intends to claim the property tax credit;
and
(ii) when the business entity expects to meet the requirements
specified for the property tax credit under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(4) To qualify for a property tax credit under this subsection:
(i) an existing business entity in the county shall:
1. obtain at least an additional 1,500 square feet of new,
RENOVATED, or expanded premises by purchasing newly constructed premises,
constructing new premises, causing new premises to be constructed, RENOVATING
EXISTING PREMISES, or leasing previously unoccupied premises; and
2. employ at least [one individual] FIVE INDIVIDUALS in [a]
new permanent full–time [position] POSITIONS during a 12–month period, during which
period the business entity also must obtain and occupy the new, RENOVATED, or expanded
premises;
(ii) a new business entity locating in the county shall:
1. obtain at least 2,500 square feet of new, RENOVATED, or
expanded premises by purchasing newly constructed premises, constructing new premises,
causing new premises to be constructed, RENOVATING EXISTING PREMISES, or leasing
previously unoccupied premises; and
2. employ at least [five] 25 individuals in new permanent
full–time positions during a 24–month period, during which period the business entity also
must obtain and occupy the new, RENOVATED, or expanded premises; or
(iii) a new business entity locating in the county or an existing
business entity in the county shall:
1. invest at least [$10,000,000] $20,000,000 in capital
improvements in the county by purchasing newly constructed premises, constructing new
– 3 –

Ch. 236 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
premises, causing new premises to be constructed, RENOVATING EXISTING PREMISES, or
leasing previously unoccupied premises; and
2. as a result of the capital improvements specified in item 1
of this item, create [100] 200 new permanent full–time positions.
(5) (i) If an existing business entity in the county meets the
requirements of paragraph (4)(i) of this subsection, the property tax credit granted under
this subsection shall equal a percentage of the amount of property tax imposed on the
assessment of the new, RENOVATED, or expanded premises, as follows:
1. [52%] 55% in the first [and second taxable years]
TAXABLE YEAR;
2. [39%] 40% in the [third and fourth taxable years]
SECOND TAXABLE YEAR; and
3. [26%] 25% in the [fifth and sixth taxable years] THIRD
TAXABLE YEAR.
(ii) If a new business entity locating in the county meets the
requirements of paragraph (4)(ii) of this subsection, the property tax credit granted under
this subsection shall equal a percentage of the amount of property tax imposed on the
assessment of the new, RENOVATED, or expanded premises, as follows:
1. [30%] 55% in the first and second taxable years;
2. [20%] 40% in the third and fourth taxable years; and
3. [10%] 25% in the fifth and sixth taxable years.
(iii) If a new or existing business entity in the county meets the
requirements of paragraph (4)(iii) of this subsection, the property tax credit granted under
this subsection shall equal a percentage of the amount of county property tax imposed on
the assessment of the new, RENOVATED, or expanded premises, as follows:
1. [100%] 75% for each of the first 5 taxable years;
2. [75%] 70% in THE SIXTH taxable [years 6 through 10]
YEAR;
3. [50%] 65% in THE SEVENTH taxable [years 11 through
15] YEAR; [and]
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 236
4. 60% IN THE EIGHTH TAXABLE YEAR;
5. 55% IN THE NINTH TAXABLE YEAR;
6. 50% IN THE 10TH TAXABLE YEAR;
7. 45% IN THE 11TH TAXABLE YEAR;
8. 40% IN THE 12TH TAXABLE YEAR;
9. 35% IN THE 13TH TAXABLE YEAR;
10. 30% IN THE 14TH TAXABLE YEAR;
11. 25% IN THE 15TH TAXABLE YEAR; AND
[4.] 12. 0% in taxable year 16 and each taxable year
thereafter.
(6) The lessor of real property granted a property tax credit under this
subsection shall reduce the amount of taxes for which a business entity is contractually
liable under the lease agreement by the amount of any credit granted under this subsection
for improvements made by the business entity.
(7) The governing body of Washington County shall provide, by law, for:
(i) the specific requirements for eligibility for a property tax credit
authorized under this subsection;
(ii) any additional limitations on eligibility for the credit; and
(iii) any other provision appropriate to implement the credit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 5 –